Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE F. OTHER COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES

CHAPTER 105. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 105.001. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM. The University of North Texas System is composed of:

(1) the University of North Texas;

(2) the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth;

(3) the University of North Texas at Dallas; and

(4) the University of North Texas at Dallas College of Law.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1213 (S.B. 956), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 105.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of regents of the University of North Texas System.

(2) "Health Science Center" means the University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth.

(3) "System" means the University of North Texas System including its components and entities.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 105.051. BOARD OF REGENTS. The organization, control, and management of the University of North Texas System and each component institution of the system is vested in a board of nine regents appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.052. TERM OF OFFICE; REMOVAL; VACANCY. The term of office of each regent is six years, with the terms of three regents expiring every two years. Members of the board may be removed from office for inefficiency or malfeasance of office. Any vacancy that occurs on the board shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.053. OATH. Each member of the board shall take the constitutional oath of office before assuming the duties of his office.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.054. OFFICERS; MEETINGS. The board shall elect a chairman and any other officers it considers necessary. The chairman may convene the board when the chairman considers it expedient to consider any business related to the system.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD

Sec. 105.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The board may direct, govern, operate, support, maintain, manage, and control the system.

(b) The board may:

(1) erect, equip, maintain, and repair system buildings;

(2) purchase libraries, furniture, equipment, fuel, and supplies necessary to operate the system;

(3) employ and discharge personnel, including faculty, to carry out the board's powers and duties;

(4) adopt rules and policies for the administration of the board's powers and duties;

(5) in accordance with the rules of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, prescribe for each component institution programs and courses leading to customary degrees as are offered at outstanding American universities and award those degrees, including baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents;

(6) establish admission standards for each component institution;

(7) perform other acts that contribute to the development of the system or to the welfare of students of component institutions; and

(8) delegate a power or assign a duty of the board to an officer, employee, or committee designated by the board.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.102. CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICERS. (a) The board shall appoint a chancellor who serves as chief executive officer of the system.

(b) The board shall appoint a president of each component institution who serves as chief executive officer of the institution.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 268 (H.B. 1913), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2017.

Sec. 105.103. EMINENT DOMAIN: RESTRICTION. (a) The board may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire land for the use of the system.

(b) The board must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, but the board is not required to provide a bond for appeal or a bond for costs.

(c) The board may not use the power of eminent domain to acquire land that is dedicated to a public use by another governmental entity.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.104. DONATIONS, GIFTS, GRANTS, AND ENDOWMENT. (a) From any source, including the federal government, a municipality, a foundation, a trust fund, a corporation, another education agency, or any other person, the board may accept donations, gifts, grants, and endowments of money or property, real or personal, for the system to be held in trust and administered by the board for the purposes and under the direction, limitations, and provisions declared in writing in the donation, gift, grant, or endowment.

(b) The donation, gift, grant, or endowment must be consistent with the laws of this state and with the objectives and proper management of the system.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.105. FUNDS RECEIVED FOR TRUST SERVICES. (a) The board may deposit in an appropriate system account outside the state treasury all funds received as administrative fees or charges for services rendered in the management or administration of a trust estate under the control of the system.

(b) The funds under Subsection (a) may be spent by the board for any educational purpose of the system.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.106. DISBURSEMENT OF FUNDS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the board shall disburse all appropriations to the system.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, the board may adopt rules for:

(1) the disbursal of appropriations and other funds;

(2) the auditing and approval of system accounts; and

(3) the issuance of system vouchers and warrants.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.107. SYSTEM PROPERTY. (a) The board has the sole and exclusive management and control of system lands.

(b) The board may acquire by purchase, donation, exchange, condemnation, or otherwise:

(1) land, including improvements, for the use of the system; and

(2) other real property that is necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of state-supported institutions of higher education.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, the board may sell, exchange, lease, or dispose of any land or other real property owned by or acquired for the board or the system.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.108. CONTRACTS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a contract with the system must be approved by the board.

(b) The board by rule may delegate to a representative of the board or an employee of the system the authority to negotiate, execute, and approve a contract with the system.

(c) A contract that is not approved in accordance with this section is void.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.109. JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may make joint appointments in the component institutions of the system, with the salary of any person who receives a joint appointment to be apportioned to the appointing institution on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.110. RESEARCH PARK. (a) The board may authorize the establishment of a research park by one or more component institutions of the system.

(b) The administrator of the research park may use private or public entities for scientific and technological research and development in the surrounding region.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER D. MISCELLANEOUS ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 105.151. MANDATORY VENUE; SERVICE OF PROCESS. (a) Venue for a suit filed against the system, the board, the University of North Texas, or officers or employees of the University of North Texas is in Denton County.

(b) Venue for a suit filed solely against the health science center or officers or employees of the health science center is in Tarrant County.

(c) Venue for a suit filed solely against the University of North Texas at Dallas or against officers or employees of the University of North Texas at Dallas is in Dallas County.

(c-1) Venue for a suit filed solely against the University of North Texas at Dallas College of Law or against officers or employees of the University of North Texas at Dallas College of Law is in Dallas County.

(d) In case of a conflict between Subsection (a), (b), (c), or (c-1) and any other law, Subsection (a), (b), (c), or (c-1) controls.

(e) Service of citation or other required process must be made on the attorney general and on an individual named by board rule as a representative of the board.

(f) This section does not waive any defense or any immunity to suit or liability that may be asserted by an entity or other person described by Subsection (a), (b), or (c).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1213 (S.B. 956), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 105.152. POLICE JURISDICTION. Campus peace officers shall have the same jurisdiction, powers, privileges, and immunities as specified in Section 51.203, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.153. DELEGATION OF MUNICIPAL PARKING REGULATION AUTHORITY. (a) By contract between the municipality and the component institution, the governing body of the municipality may delegate to the institution the authority to regulate the parking of vehicles on any public street running through or immediately adjacent to property owned or occupied and controlled by the institution.

(b) The contract may authorize the component institution to assign and regulate parking spaces for its use, to charge and collect a fee from its personnel and students for parking, to prohibit parking, and to charge and collect a fee for removing vehicles parked in violation of law or ordinance or in violation of a rule governing the parking of vehicles adopted by the board.

(c) The contract must be approved by resolution of the board and the governing body of the municipality.

(d) The component institution shall have jurisdiction over property owned or controlled by the institution to the extent that it may:

(1) assign and regulate parking spaces for its use and charge and collect appropriate fees for parking and improper parking;

(2) prohibit parking where it considers necessary; and

(3) set and collect fees for and remove vehicles parked in violation of its rules and regulations or of state law.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.154. CONSTRUCTION OF PROVISIONS REGARDING CAMPUS SECURITY PERSONNEL. Sections 105.152 and 105.153 do not:

(1) limit the police powers of the municipality or its law enforcement jurisdiction;

(2) render a campus peace officer an employee of the municipality or entitle a campus peace officer to compensation from the municipality; or

(3) restrict the power of the component institution under other law to enforce laws, ordinances, or rules regulating traffic or parking.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER E. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS

Sec. 105.201. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "university" means the University of North Texas.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.202. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS. The University of North Texas is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Denton.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.203. CONTRACTS WITH CITY FOR UTILITY SERVICES. The board may contract with the City of Denton for the furnishing of water and other utility services to the university. The rates to be charged the university may not exceed those regularly established, published, and declared rates for similar customers. If there are no similar customers, the rates to be charged shall be those established by the City of Denton for commercial users. The city may make any adjustments, discounts, and special rates that the governing authorities of the city may consider appropriate to provide for the university.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.204. MENTORING PROGRAM. (a) The board may establish a mentoring program at the university. The program may provide mentoring, tutoring, and other resources to students at all levels of the educational system to assist students to:

(1) succeed in their education and achieve appropriate educational goals; and

(2) prepare for the transition from being a student to becoming an independent adult member of society.

(b) The program may recruit, train, coordinate, and support mentors and tutors and may provide other resources to students in the communities primarily served by the university who are students at risk of dropping out of school, as defined by Section 29.081, or who are otherwise in need of services to assist them in successfully completing their education and becoming productive members of the community.

(c) The board shall establish in connection with the program a continuing study and evaluation of mentoring activities and research into the best practices and methods of mentoring.

(d) At the times determined by the board, the board shall prepare a report relating to the operation of the program. The report must include:

(1) a description of the program;

(2) information relating to the students served by the program;

(3) an analysis of the effects of the program on student performance, including effects on dropout rates, school attendance, grades, performance on assessment tests, graduation rates, and entry into higher education programs;

(4) the costs of the program and the sources of funds used to support the program; and

(5) the board's recommendations for continuing the program and for any changes in the law authorizing the program.

(e) The board may use available institutional funds, as defined by Section 51.009, to support the program. The board may solicit and accept gift, grants, and donations from any public or private source to support the program.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER F. STATE HISTORICAL COLLECTION

Sec. 105.251. DESIGNATION. The historical collection of the University of North Texas, consisting of books, documents, stamps, coins, firearms, implements of warfare, relics, heirlooms, and other items of historical importance, is designated as a State Historical Collection, to be known as "The State Historical Collection of the University of North Texas."

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.252. GIFTS AND DONATIONS. The board may accept and receive gifts, donations, and collections of books, documents, stamps, coins, firearms, implements of warfare, relics, heirlooms, and collections of all kinds having historical importance and value, to be used in teaching the youth of this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.253. RULES REGARDING GIFTS AND DONATIONS. The board may adopt any rules regarding the receiving and holding of these gifts, donations, and collections that it considers necessary and advisable.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER G. TEXAS ACADEMY OF MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE

Sec. 105.301. ESTABLISHMENT; SCOPE. (a) The Texas Academy of Mathematics and Science is established as a division of the University of North Texas for the following purposes:

(1) to provide an enriched school for gifted and talented high school juniors and seniors to complete their high school education and to attend college courses for credit;

(2) to identify exceptionally gifted and intelligent high school students at the junior and senior levels and offer them a challenging education to maximize their development;

(3) to provide a rigorous academic program emphasizing mathematics and science, but also including a strong and varied humanities curriculum; and

(4) to reduce the shortage of mathematics and science professionals in this state.

(b) The academy is a residential, coeducational institution for selected Texas high school students with interest and potential in mathematics and science under the control and management of the board. Faculty members of the university shall teach all academic classes at the academy.

(c) A student of the academy may attend a college course offered by the university and receive college credit for that course.

(d) The board shall set aside adequate space on the university campus in Denton to be used for the operation of the academy and to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

(e) The academy is not subject to the provisions of this code, or to the rules of the Texas Education Agency, regulating public schools, except that:

(1) professional employees of the academy are entitled to the limited liability of an employee under Section 22.0511, 22.0512, or 22.052;

(2) a student's attendance at the academy satisfies compulsory school attendance requirements; and

(3) for each student enrolled, the academy is entitled to allotments from the foundation school program under Chapter 48 as if the academy were a school district without a tier one local share for purposes of Section 48.266.

(f) If in any academic year the amount of the allotments under Subsection (e)(3) exceeds the amount of state funds paid to the academy under this section in the fiscal year ending August 31, 2003, the commissioner shall set aside from the total amount of funds to which school districts are entitled under Section 48.266(c) an amount equal to the excess amount and shall distribute that amount to the academy. After deducting the amount set aside and paid to the academy by the commissioner under this subsection, the commissioner shall reduce the amount to which each district is entitled under Section 48.266(c) in the manner described by Section 48.266(f). A determination of the commissioner under this section is final and may not be appealed.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 204, Sec. 15.05, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 241, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.071, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 105.302. SUPERVISION BY ADVISORY BOARD. (a) In operating the academy the board shall consider the advice of an advisory board composed of nine members.

(b) Each of the following shall appoint one member to serve on the advisory board:

(1) the chairman of the State Board of Education;

(2) the commissioner of higher education;

(3) the president of the Texas Association of School Administrators;

(4) the president of the Texas Association for the Gifted and Talented;

(5) the governor;

(6) the lieutenant governor; and

(7) the speaker of the Texas House of Representatives.

(c) The president of the University of North Texas shall appoint two members to the advisory board.

(d) A member of the advisory board serves for a term of six years. If reappointed, a member may serve for more than one term.

(e) A member of the advisory board may not receive compensation for the performance of duties on the advisory board, but a member is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out official duties from funds appropriated for the academy.

(f) The advisory board shall make recommendations to the dean of the academy concerning the following:

(1) admission criteria;

(2) extracurricular activities;

(3) programs of study;

(4) rules for the discipline of students and for the management of the academy and academy programs;

(5) a formula of admission that ensures the admission of students from the various geographical areas of the state; and

(6) acceptance of nominations for and the selection of students to be admitted to the academy.

(g) The advisory board shall conduct an annual evaluation of the programs of the academy.

(h) A rule recommended by the advisory board under Subsection (f) shall be consistent with the law and, if adopted, shall be enforced by the staff and faculty of the academy.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 6.011, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 105.303. PROGRAM AND OPERATION. (a) The academy shall operate on the same fall and spring semester basis as the University of North Texas. Full-time students of the academy must be enrolled for both the fall and spring semesters.

(b) In addition to academic classes, the academy may offer short courses, workshops, seminars, weekend instructional programs, summer programs, and other innovative programs.

(c) The pupil-teacher ratio in all regular academic classes at the academy may not exceed 30 students for each classroom teacher, except that the pupil-teacher ratio may exceed that limit:

(1) in programs provided under Subsection (b), in physical education courses, or in special enrichment courses; or

(2) if the board determines that a class with more than 30 students for each classroom teacher would contribute to the educational development of the students in the class.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.304. EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES. The academy may offer any extracurricular activity that a public secondary school could offer. Students attending the academy may participate in all extracurricular activities sanctioned by the university interscholastic league.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.305. ELIGIBILITY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the academy shall admit only high school juniors and seniors.

(b) The academy may provide for an early admission year to allow the admission of a student who is not yet a high school junior if the abilities of the student warrant early entry.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.306. FUNDING. (a) The board is hereby authorized to use available funds or to enter into contracts and accept grants or matching grants for the purpose of establishing an academy of mathematics and science.

(b) Any money received by the academy shall be expended to further the functions and purposes of the academy listed in Section 105.301.

(c) This section does not prevent the board from accepting federal funds or money from any corporation or other private contributor for use in operating or providing programs to the academy.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.307. DEAN. (a) The board may appoint a dean of the academy who shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(b) The dean shall report to the provost of the University of North Texas and shall have a seat on the council of deans.

(c) The dean shall prepare an annual budget for the operation of the academy and submit the budget to the provost of the university.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.308. LIABILITY. (a) The liability of the state under Chapters 101 and 104, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is limited for the academy and employees assigned to the academy and acting on behalf of the academy to the same extent that the liability of a school district and an employee of the school district is limited under Sections 22. 051 and 22.052 of this code and Section 101.051, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(b) An employee assigned to the academy is entitled to representation by the attorney general in a civil suit based on an action or omission of the employee in the course of the employee's employment, limits on liability, and indemnity under Chapters 104 and 108, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER H. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER AT FORT WORTH

Sec. 105.401. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS HEALTH SCIENCE CENTER AT FORT WORTH. The University of North Texas Health Science Center at Fort Worth is a coeducational institution of higher education that consists of a college of osteopathic medicine and other programs as prescribed by the board in accordance with the rules of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.403. TEACHING HOSPITAL; FACILITIES. (a) A complete teaching hospital for the health science center shall be furnished without cost or expense to the state.

(b) The board shall provide for adequate physical facilities for use by the health science center in its teaching and research programs.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

Sec. 105.404. AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER ENTITIES. The board may execute and carry out affiliation or coordinating agreements with any other entity, school, or institution in this state to provide clinical, postgraduate, including internship and residency, or other levels of medical educational work for the health science center.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER J. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS AT DALLAS

Sec. 105.501. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS AT DALLAS. (a) The University of North Texas at Dallas is established as an institution of higher education and component institution of the University of North Texas System in the city of Dallas on property designated by the board.

(b) The board may accept gifts, grants, and donations and may acquire land for the University of North Texas at Dallas.

(c) The board may plan for the development of the University of North Texas at Dallas and for the academic programs offered by the university.

Text of subsection effective until May 23, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the University of North Texas at Dallas may operate as a general academic teaching institution with its own chief executive officer, administration, and faculty only after the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at the University of North Texas System Center at Dallas has reached an enrollment equivalent to 1,000 full-time students for one semester. Until that enrollment level is reached, the board may operate a system center of the University of North Texas in the city of Dallas. Prior to reaching 2,500 full-time equivalent students, the University of North Texas at Dallas may not receive general revenue in excess of the 2003 expended amount with the exception of funding provided through the General Academic Instruction and Operations Formula for semester credit hour increases and the Tuition Revenue Bond debt service for bonds approved in the 78th Legislature. The institution will not be eligible to receive the small school supplement in the General Academic Instruction and Operations Formula until it reaches 2,500 full-time equivalent student enrollment.

Text of subsection effective on May 23, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the University of North Texas at Dallas may operate as a general academic teaching institution with its own chief executive officer, administration, and faculty only after the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at the University of North Texas System Center at Dallas has reached an enrollment equivalent to 1,000 full-time students for one semester. Until that enrollment level is reached, the board may operate a system center of the University of North Texas in the city of Dallas.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 25, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1266, Sec. 7.01, eff. June 20, 2003. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 105.451 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(49), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129 (S.B. 629), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2009.

Text of section effective on June 19, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1213, Sec. 6, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

Sec. 105.502. UNIVERSITY OF NORTH TEXAS SYSTEM COLLEGE OF LAW. (a) The board may establish and operate a school of law in the city of Dallas as a professional school of the University of North Texas System.

(b) In administering the law school, the board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered at other leading American schools of law and may award those degrees.

(c) Until the University of North Texas at Dallas has been administered as a general academic teaching institution for five years, the board shall administer the law school as a professional school of the system. After that period, the law school shall become a professional school of the University of North Texas at Dallas. Until the law school becomes a professional school of the University of North Texas at Dallas, the law school:

(1) is considered an institution of higher education under Section 61.003 for all purposes under other law; and

(2) is entitled to formula funding as if the law school were a professional school of a general academic teaching institution.

(d) Before the board establishes a law school under this section, but not later than June 1, 2010, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall prepare a feasibility study to determine the actions the system must take to obtain accreditation of the law school. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall deliver a copy of the study to the chair of each legislative standing committee or subcommittee with jurisdiction over higher education.

(e) The board may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from any public or private source for the purposes of this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1213 (S.B. 956), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.